GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/rules-german.xfst
echo >>> clean up ...
define LEX
read regex [
	"^/" e <- %^CpdE 
.o.	LEX 

# dusselig -> dusselig-, dusslig
# 3-gliederig^}keit -> 3-gliederigkeit, 3-gliedrigkeit
# BUT: red|selig -> *redslig
.o.	e (->) 0 || Vowel [Cons]+ _ [l|r] i g [ BD | EOW ]

# euer+ig -> eurig
# unser+ig -> unsrig
.o.	e (->) 0 || _ r MBD i g 

# removal of final "e"
## müde^+er	-> müder
.o.	e -> 0	|| \[i|e] _ MBD Vowel	###????
.o.	e -> 0	||  _ MBD e

.o.	[DRS|DBL|MBD] -> 0
.o.	DRP -> %^Low

];

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> genitive and plural of proper names
# Goethe^PGen -> Goethes
# Müller^PPl -> Müllers
# Lenz^PGen -> Lenz', ?Lenzens
# Lenz^PPl  -> Lenzens
# Strauss^PGen -> Strauss', Straussens
define LEX

define SNAME	[ s (DBL) | ß | x | z ] ("^*") ;

read regex [
	LEX
.o.	%^PGen (->) %' || SNAME _
.o.	[ %^PGen | %^PPl ] -> {ens} || SNAME _
.o.	[ %^PGen | %^PPl ] -> s
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------
# added 05-Nov-2003
echo >>> restrict dative -e
define LEX

read regex [
     	~$[ e %+Noun [%+Masc|%+Neut] %+Sg %+Dat2 ]
.o.    	LEX
];
 
# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> restrict compound "-s-"
define LEX

read regex [
	LEX

# Haus^/s   -> *Hauss-
# Haus^s/es -> Hauses
.o.	~$[ [s|ß|x|z] FBD s ]

# Pfau^/s   -> *Pfaus-
# Pfau^/es  -> *Pfaues-
.o.	~$[ Vowel (h) FBD (e) s ]


.o.	FBD -> 0
];



# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> upper/lower case (for derivations)
define LEX
read regex [
	LEX

.o.	%^Upp -> 0  || CBD1 _ 

.o.	a->A, ä->Ä, b->B, c->C, d->D, e->E, f->F, g->G, h->H, 
	i->I, j->J, k->K, l->L, m->M, n->N, o->O, ö->Ö, p->P,
	q->Q, r->R, s->S, t->T, u->U, ü->Ü, v->V, w->W, x->X, 
	y->Y, z->Z || %^Upp _

.o.	A->a, Ä->ä, B->b, C->c, D->d, E->e, F->f, G->g, H->h, 
	I->i, J->j, K->k, L->l, M->m, N->n, O->o, Ö->ö, P->p,
	Q->q, R->r, S->s, T->t, U->u, Ü->ü, V->v, W->w, X->x, 
	Y->y, Z->z || [%^Low|CBD1|SEP]  _

.o.	[%^Low|%^Upp] -> 0
] ;


# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> "e" elision 
define LEX
read regex [
     LEX
# finde's	-> find's
# finde		-> finde, find ('s)
.o.  e -> "*DEL*" || _ %^Elv TBD
.o.  e (->) "*DEL*" || _ %^Elv
.o. %^Elv -> 0 || "*DEL*" _
.o. "*DEL*" -> 0

#.o.  [ e %^ElV ] -> 0 || _ TBD
#.o.  [ e %^ElV ] (->) 0
#.o. ~$[ \[e] %^Elv ]

# gehen^ELID	-> gehn, geh'n
# schauen^ELID	-> schaun, schau'n
# Darlehen^ELID -> Darlehn, Darleh'n
# Frauen^ELID	-> Fraun, Frau'n
# wollen^ELID	-> *wolln, woll'n,
# finde^ELID	-> find'
# Auge^ELID	-> Aug'

.o.   e -> [%^Eps|%^Apo]  || Vowel [Vowel|h] _ n (%^ElV) %^ELID
.o.   e -> [%^Apo]	  || _ (n) (%^ElV) %^ELID 
.o.   %^ELID -> 0	  || $[%^Eps|%^Apo] _
.o.   %^Eps -> 0
.o.   %^Apo -> %'
] ;

set quit-on-fail off
substitute label 0 for %^ElV
substitute label 0 for %^ELID
set quit-on-fail on

define LEX

# corrected 05-Nov-2003
read regex [
	0 <- %^ElV
#.o.	%+ElidS <- %^ElV	|| _ (SPELL) .#.
.o.	%+ElidS <- %^ElV	# 08/08/2006
.o.	%+Elid <- %^ELID
.o.	LEX 
];


# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> "ss" -> "ß" 
define LEX

define BOUND	BAR | EOW | CBD | %- ;


###### Begin of change
###	set flag-is-epsilon off
###	define SSMAP	[
###	       [..] -> [%^NS|%^OS] || s s _ FLAG* [ Cons | TAG | BOUND ] 
###	.o.	s s -> ß || _ %^OS  
###	];
###	
###	
###	read regex [ SSMAP.i .o. LEX .o. SSMAP ];
###	
###	set quit-on-fail off
###	#substitute label "@U.lem.old@" for %^OS:0
###	#substitute label "@U.lem.new@" for %^NS:0
###	
###	substitute label 0:"^OS" for %^OS:0
###	substitute label 0:"^NS" for %^NS:0
###	
###	substitute label "@U.spell.old@" for 0:%^OS
###	substitute label "@U.spell.new@" for 0:%^NS
###	set quit-on-fail on
###	
###	set flag-is-epsilon on
###### End of old

set flag-is-epsilon off
read regex [
	ß <- s s || _ "@U.lem.old@"
.o.	[ "@U.lem.new@" | "@U.lem.old@" ] <- [..]  || s s _ FLAG* [ Cons | TAG | BOUND ] 
.o.	LEX 
.o.	[..] -> [ "@U.srf.new@" | "@U.srf.old@" ]  || s s _ FLAG* [ Cons | TAG | BOUND ] 
.o.	s s -> ß || _ "@U.srf.old@"
];
twosided flag-diacritics
set flag-is-epsilon on

#### End of new

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> triple consonants in compounds (old spelling rules)
## Schiff^#Fahrt	   -> Schiffahrt
## Schiff^#Fracht	   -> Schifffracht
## voll^=laufen		   -> vollaufen
## Fett^#triefend	   -> fetttriefend
## Fett^#topf		   -> Fettopf
## schwimm^#meister	   -> Schwimmeister
## BUT: Schloss^#sänger	   -> Schloßsänger

define LEX

define ELIM	 [ [%^OS %^REM] | %^NS ] ;	

define BDX	 CBD1 | SEP ;

read regex [
	LEX 
.o.	[..] -> ELIM ||
		       f f BDX _ f Vowel
		     , l l BDX _ l Vowel
		     , m m BDX _ m Vowel
		     , n n BDX _ n Vowel
		     , p p BDX _ p Vowel
		     , r r BDX _ r Vowel
		     , t t BDX _ t Vowel
		     
.o.	[f|l|m|n|p|r|t] -> "*EPS*" || %^REM _
.o.	%^REM -> 0

];

set quit-on-fail off

substitute label "@U.srf.old@" for 0:%^OS
substitute label "@U.srf.new@" for 0:%^NS


set quit-on-fail on


# ============================================================================
echo >>> final cleanup

define LEX
read regex [
	0 <- [ BAR | ACC ]
.o.	LEX
.o.	SPACE -> " "
.o.	[ BAR | ACC | DOT | SEP ] -> 0
.o.	CBD2 -> %- 
.o.	CBD1 -> %- || .#.  _
.o.	CBD1 -> 0
] ;

echo >>> shorten spelling tags
set flag-is-epsilon on

define LEX 

read regex [ 
	%^New <- %^NewLem %^NewSrf 
.o.	%^Old <- %^OldLem %^OldSrf
.o.	%^Err <- %^ErrLem %^ErrSrf
] .o. LEX ;
